Utah statutes.
19-6-722.   Criminal penalties.
(1)  A violation of any applicable provision of this part is a class A
misdemeanor, except:
(a)  any violation involving hazardous waste is governed by provisions of this
chapter that address hazardous waste;
(b)  any violation of Section 19-6-714 or 19-6-715 regarding the recycling fee
is subject to penalties authorized under Section 19-6-716.
(2)  Any person who knowingly conducts any activities identified in Subsection
19-6-113(3) regarding hazardous waste in conjunction with any operations under
this part is subject to the enforcement actions and penalties identified in
Subsection 19-6-113(4).
(3)  All penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the
account created in Section 19-6-719.
